Utah statutes.
41-6a-510.   Local DUI and related ordinances and reckless driving and
impaired driving ordinances -- Consistent with code.
(1)  An ordinance adopted by a local authority that governs the following
matters shall be consistent with the provisions in this code which govern the
following matters:
(a)  a person's operating or being in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while having alcohol in the blood or while under the influence of
alcohol or any drug or the combined influence of alcohol and any drug; or
(b)  in relation to any of the matters described in Subsection (1)(a), the use
of:
(i)  a chemical test or chemical tests;
(ii)  evidentiary presumptions;
(iii)  penalties; or
(iv)  any combination of the matters described in Subsection (1).
(2)  An ordinance adopted by a local authority that governs reckless driving,
impaired driving, or operating a vehicle in willful or wanton disregard for
the safety of persons or property shall be consistent with the provisions of
this code which govern those matters.
